test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VII_D_IND_mnopgod_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VII - D - mnopgot :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	obv     mod     per
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 257)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mnopgot+VII+0: mnopgod
     mnopgot+VII+0+4: mnopgodni

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mnopgot+VII+0+Prt: mnopgodba
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt: mnopgodniwba #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt: mnopgodniba #book (w-del)
     mnopgot+VII+0+Dub: mnopgoddig
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+Dub: mnopgodniwdig #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+0+4+Dub: mnopgodnidig #book (w-del)
     mnopgot+VII+0+Prt+Dub: mnopgodgoba
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnopgodnigba #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnopgodnogba #book (unexplained quality shift)

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     mnopgot+VII+0+Prt+0+Pl: mnopgodbaniin
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mnopgodniwbaniin #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mnopgodnibniin #book (overdeletion in book, iniwiban -> nibn)
     mnopgot+VII+0+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgoddigenan #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+0+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgodgenan #book (overdeletion in book)
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgodniwdigenan #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+0+4+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgodnindigenan #book (whence the nasal??)
     mnopgot+VII+0+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgodgobniin
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgodnigbaniin #cons
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgodnogbaniin #book (unexplained quality shift)

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mnopgot+VII+0+0+Pl: mnopgodoon
     mnopgot+VII+0+4+0+Pl: mnopgodniwan

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0: mnopgosnoo #d deletes in negative!
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4: mnopgosnooni #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4: mnopgsnooni #book (surprising over deletion)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Prt: mnopgosnooba
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt: mnopgosnoonwiba
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Dub: mnopgosnoodig
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Dub: mnopgosnoonwidig
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub: mnopgosnoogba #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub: mnopgsnoogba #book (surprising over deletion)
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnopgosnoongoba #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnopgsnoongoba #book

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: mnopgosnoobniin
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mnopgosnoonwibniin
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgosnoodgenan
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgosnoonwidgenan
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgosnoogbaniin #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgsnoogbaniin #book (surprising over deletion)
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgosnoongobniin #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnopgsnoongobniin #book (surprising over deletion)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+0+Pl: mnopgosnoon #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+0+Pl: mnopgsnoon #book
     mnopgot+VII+Neg+0+4+0+Pl: mnopgosninwan #no variation listed in book
